en: filling, stuffing
be: Фарш
bg: пълнеж
br: Fars
ca: farciment, farcit
cs: Nadívání
cv: Фарш
da: Fyld
de: Belag, Farce, Füllung
el: Γέμιση
eo: farĉo
es: relleno
et: Hakkliha
fa: گوشت چرخ کرده
fi: täyte
fr: garniture, fourrage, farce, fourrage blanc, remplissage
gl: Recheo
he: מלית
hr: punjenje, punjenje od, punilo, nadjev, posip
hu: töltelék
id: Isian
io: Farso
is: Kæfa
it: ripieno
ja: ファルス
ko: 소
ku: Goştê kişandî
lv: pildījums
mk: Фил
nb: Kjøttdeig
nl: garnituur, vulling
pl: Farsz, nadzienie, wsad, nadzienie z
pt: recheio
ru: фаршировка, начинка
sv: fyllning
ta: உள்வைப்பு
th: อาหารยัดไส้
tr: Dolgu
uk: Фарш
zh: 餡

en: apricot filling
bg: кайсиев пълнеж
de: Aprikosenfüllung
es: relleno de albaricoque
fi: aprikoositäyte
fr: fourrage à l'abricot
hr: nadjev od marelice
it: farcitura all'albicocca
nl: abrikozenvulling
pl: nadzienie morelowe, nadzienie o smaku morelowym
pt: recheio de damasco

en: milk filling
bg: млечен пълнеж
de: Milchfüllung
es: relleno de leche
fi: maitotäyte
fr: fourrage lait, fourrage au lait
hr: nadjev od mlijeka
it: farcitura al latte
nl: melkvulling
pl: nadzienie mleczne, krem o smaku mlecznym
pt: recheio de leite

en: cocoa filling
bg: какаов пълнеж
de: Kakaofüllung
es: relleno de cacao, Relleno cacao
fi: kaakaotäyte
fr: fourrage au cacao
hr: kakaovo punjenje, nadjev s okusom kakaa
it: farcitura al cioccolato
nl: cacaovulling
pl: nadzienie kakaowe, nadzienie o smaku kakaowym
pt: recheio de cacau
ru: какао начинка
sv: kakafyllning

en: raspberry filling
bg: малинов пълнеж
de: Himbeerfüllung
fi: vadelmatäyte
fr: garniture aux framboises
hr: punjenje od malina, punjenje od malina
it: ripieno di lamponi
pl: nadzienie malinowe, nadzienie o smaku malinowym, wsad owocowy z malin
sv: hallonfyllning

en: caramel filling
bg: карамелен пълнеж
de: karamellfüllung
es: relleno de caramelo
fi: kinuskitäyte
fr: fourrage caramel
hr: nadjev od karamele
it: ripieno al caramello
nb: karamellfyll
pl: nadzienie karmelowe
pt: recheio de caramelo
sv: karamellfyllning

en: stuffing with vanilla flavor
bg: пълнеж с ванилов вкус
de: Füllung mit Vanillegeschmack
es: relleno con sabor a vainilla
fi: täyte vaniljan makuisena
fr: garniture à la vanille
hr: nadjev s okusom vanilije
it: ripieno al gusto di vaniglia
nl: vulling met vanillesmaak
pl: nadzienie o smaku waniliowym, nadzienie waniliowe, wsad waniliowy
pt: recheio com sabor de baunilha
sv: fyllning med vaniljsmak

en: filling with pear
nl: vulling met peer

en: brioche, Brioches
xx: brioche
ar: بريوش
az: Brioş
ca: Brioix
el: Τσουρέκι
eo: brioĉo
fi: Briossi
fr: Brioches
he: בריוש
hy: Բրիոշ
io: Briocho
ja: ブリオッシュ
ka: ბრიოში
ko: 브리오슈
mk: Бриош
nl: Brioches
ru: Бриошь
sr: Бриош
uk: Бріош
zh: 布里歐

en: dough
ak: mori
az: xəmir
ba: ҡамыр
be: цеста
bg: тесто
ca: massa
ce: bod
cs: těsto
cv: чуста
cy: toes
da: dej
de: teig
ee: ayma
el: ζυμάρι, ζύμη
eo: pasto
es: masa
et: taigen
eu: ore
fa: خمیر
fi: taikina
fr: pâte
ga: taos
he: בצק
hr: tijesto
ht: pat
hu: guba
hy: խմոր
id: adonan
io: pasto
is: deig
it: impasto
ja: パン生地
kk: қамыр
kn: ಕಣಕ
ko: 도
ky: камыр
lb: deegwueren
lt: tešla
lv: mīkla
mk: тесто
mo: blat
ms: doh
nb: deig
ne: आटा
nl: deeg, deegwaar
nn: deig
pl: surowe ciasto
pt: massa
qu: sankhu
ro: blat
ru: тесто
sk: cesto
sl: testo
sr: тесто
sv: deg
sw: kinyunga
ta: பிசைந்த மாவு
tg: хамир
th: โด
tl: tapay
tr: hamur
tt: камыр
uk: тісто
uz: xamir
wa: påsse
yi: טייג
zh: 生麵團

en: pizza dough
da: pizzadej
de: Pizzateig
es: masa para pizza, masa de pizza
fi: pizzataikina
fr: pâte à pizza
hr: tijesto za pizzu
it: impasto per pizza
nl: pizzadeeg
sv: pizzadeg

en: pizza base
bg: тесто за пица
cs: korpus pizzy
de: Pizzaboden
fi: pizzapohja
fr: fond de pizza
hr: baza za pizzu
hu: pizzalap
it: fondo per pizza
nl: pizzabodem
pl: spód do pizzy
sk: pizzové cesto
sv: pizzabotten

en: pizza crust
it: base per pizza
ja: ピザクラスト

en: inactive dough
de: inaktive Hefe
es: masa inactiva
fr: pâte inactive
hr: inaktivni kvasac
it: impasto inattivo
nl: inactief deeg

en: cookie dough
da: småkagedej
fr: pâte à cookies
hy: թխվածքաբլիթի խմոր
ja: クッキー生地
jv: adhonan kukis
ru: тесто для печенья
sv: kaksmet
th: คุกกี้โด
uk: тісто для печива
zh: 曲奇面团

en: cookie dough with milk chocolate
da: småkagedej med mælkechokolade

en: macaroni
de: Makkaroni
hr: makaroni
it: maccheroni
nb: makaroni
nn: makaroni
no: makaroni

en: cooked pasta
de: Teigwaren gekocht
es: Pasta cocinada
fi: kypsennetty pasta, keitetty pasta
fr: pâte cuite, pâte cuites, pâtes cuites
hr: kuhana tjestenina
it: pasta già cotta
nl: gekookte pasta
sv: kokt pasta

en: precooked pasta
de: Teig vorgebacken
es: pasta precocida
fi: esikypsennetty pasta
fr: pâtes précuites, pâte précuite, fond de pâte précuit
hr: prethodno kuhana tjestenina
it: Pasta precotta
nl: voorgebakken pasta

en: pasta, pastas
ar: معكرونة
az: makaron
be: макаронныя вырабы
bg: паста, макарони
bn: পাস্তা
br: toazennoù
bs: pasta
ca: Pasta
co: pastasciutta
cs: těstoviny
cy: pasta
da: Pasta
de: Teigwaren, Pasta
el: Ζυμαρικό
eo: pastaĵo
es: Pastas alimenticias, pastas, pasta
et: pasta
eu: pasta
fi: pasta
fr: pâtes alimentaires, pâtes
fy: pasta
ga: pasta
gd: pastà
gl: pasta
gu: પાસ્તા
he: פסטה
hi: पास्ता
hr: tjestenina
hu: olasz tészta
hy: մակարոնեղեն
id: pasta
is: pasta
it: pasta, paste alimentari
ja: パスタ
jv: pasta
ka: მაკარონი
kn: ಪಾಸ್ತಾ
ko: 파스타
ku: meqarne
la: pasta
lb: pasta
li: pasta
lt: pasta
lv: pasta
mr: पास्ता
ms: pasta
my: ပါစတာ
nb: pasta
ne: पास्ता
nl: Pastas, Deegwaren, pasta
nn: pasta
oc: pasta
or: ପାସ୍ତା
pa: ਪਾਸਤਾ
pl: makaron
pt: massa alimentícia
ro: paste făinoase
ru: Макаронные изделия
sh: pasta
sk: cestovina
sl: testenine
so: baasto
sq: pasta
sv: pasta
sw: pasta
ta: பாஸ்தா
te: పాస్తా
th: พาสตา
tl: pasta
tr: makarna
uk: макаронні вироби
ur: پاستا
uz: makaron mahsulotlari
vi: nui
wa: påsses itålyinnes
wo: makaróni
zh: 意式面食